Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF828.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1749YH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 828 Section 1. Section 235A.15, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. Notwithstanding chapter 22 , the confidentiality of 3 all child abuse information shall be maintained, except as 4 specifically provided by this section and section 235A.15A . 5 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 235A.15A Public dissemination of 6 information contained in central registry ââ founded cases of 7 child abuse involving sexual abuse. 8 1. Notwithstanding section 235A.15, the department 9 shall maintain an internet site to allow the public access 10 to relevant information about a person who is the subject 11 of a founded report of child abuse involving an act that 12 would constitute a tier II or tier III offense under section 13 692A.102, if the person was convicted. The internet site, at a 14 minimum, shall be searchable by name, county, city, zip code, 15 and geographic radius. 16 2. Information received by the department that is required 17 to be displayed on the internet site under subsection 1 shall 18 be made available on the internet site within five business 19 days of the later of the following to occur: 20 a. The date the department determines the allegation of 21 child abuse relating to the information is founded and that 22 the act that constitutes child abuse would constitute a tier 23 II or tier III offense under section 692A.102, if the alleged 24 perpetrator was convicted. 25 b. The date the department received the information. 26 3. The following information shall be disclosed on the 27 internet site pursuant to subsection 1: 28 a. The alleged perpetratorâs date of birth. 29 b. The alleged perpetratorâs name, nickname, or aliases, 30 including ethnic or tribal names. 31 c. The alleged perpetratorâs photographs. 32 d. A physical description of the alleged perpetrator, 33 including scars, marks, or tattoos. 34 e. The alleged perpetratorâs residence. 35 -1- LSB 1749YH (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 4 H.F. 828 f. The statutory citation and text of the offense the 1 alleged act of child abuse would constitute if the alleged 2 perpetrator was convicted. 3 g. Whether the alleged perpetrator is subject to residency 4 restrictions pursuant to section 692A.114. 5 h. Whether the alleged perpetrator is subject to exclusion 6 zone restrictions pursuant to section 692A.113. 7 4. The following information shall not be disclosed on the 8 departmentâs internet site: 9 a. Information about an alleged perpetrator who is the 10 subject of a founded report of child abuse and who was under 11 twenty years of age at the time the act of alleged child 12 abuse was committed, if the alleged act of child abuse would 13 constitute a violation of section 709.4, subsection 1, 14 paragraph âbâ , subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (d), if 15 the alleged perpetrator was convicted. 16 b. The employer name, address, or location where the alleged 17 perpetrator is employed. 18 c. The address and name of any school the alleged 19 perpetrator attends. 20 d. A real name if protected under 18 U.S.C. Â§3521. 21 e. Information relating to an alleged perpetrator who was 22 under eighteen years of age when the alleged act of child abuse 23 was committed. 24 f. The identity of the victim. 25 g. Information pertaining to unfounded or undetermined 26 allegations of child abuse. 27 h. Passport and immigration documents. 28 i. Government-issued driverâs licenses or nondriver 29 identification cards. 30 j. DNA information. 31 k. Fingerprints. 32 l. Palm prints. 33 m. Professional licensing information. 34 n. Social security numbers. 35 -2- LSB 1749YH (3) 91 dg/ko 2/ 4 H.F. 828 o. Records that have been sealed or expunged pursuant to 1 section 235A.18. 2 p. Information not described in subsection 3. 3 5. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the 4 dissemination of information available on the internet site 5 established in subsection 1 to the general public by the 6 department through any other means. 7 6. The department shall include on the internet site 8 established in subsection 1 instructions and forms necessary 9 for a person seeking to apply for a correction of information 10 on the internet site. 11 7. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 12 to implement this section. 13